Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-706
Abuse or neglect by custodian; filing of complaint.

Whenever the Department of Health and Human Services has reason to believe that any person having the care or custody of a child placed out, and not legally adopted, is an improper person for such care or custody, or subjects such child to cruel treatment, or neglect, or immoral surroundings, it shall cause a complaint to be filed in the proper juvenile court.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XI, § 6, p. 790;

C.S.1922, § 8270;

C.S.1929, § 71-2606;

R.S.1943, § 71-806;

Laws 1945, c. 170, § 6, p. 546;

Laws 1961, c. 204, § 10, p. 615;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 178.